Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.640

Mine owners—Maps of property surface and underground workings—Filing.

The owner of each mine shall make a map of the surface of the property. The owner of each active mine shall make a map of the underground workings. All maps shall be filed with the department. The department shall establish by rule the scale and contents required for the maps.

[ 2003 c 334 s 102; 1985 c 459 s 8. Formerly RCW 43.12.035.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Severability—1985 c 459: See note following RCW 79.14.510.